Nebraska, session 109, LB176.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB176 LB176
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 86-1304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-1304 (1)(a) A provider, a cooperative, a political subdivision,
or an Indian tribe may apply to the commission for a grant on forms
provided by the commission. The grant shall only be used for development
costs for a qualifying project. The application shall indicate the
project area. The applicant shall provide matching funds equal to fifty
percent of the total development costs of the project if located outside
a high-cost area, or twenty-five percent of the total development costs
of the project if located inside a high-cost area, as such areas are
determined by the commission. The matching funds requirement in this
subdivision shall not apply to any portion of a grant comprised of
federal funds. In order to qualify, the project is required to provide
broadband Internet service scalable to one hundred megabits per second
for downloading and one hundred megabits per second for uploading, or
greater. The commission shall establish deadlines for applications and
publish notice of the deadlines on the commission's website.
(b) An application from a political subdivision or an Indian tribe
shall be made as part of a public-private partnership with a provider.
(2)(a) As part of the application, the applicant shall agree to
complete the project within eighteen months after the date the grant is
awarded. The commission may permit extensions upon request and for good
cause shown.
(b) If a grant recipient fails to complete the project by the agreed
or extended deadline, as the case may be, the recipient shall repay the
grant as provided in this subdivision. If no extension is permitted, ten
percent of the grant shall be repaid for each month that the project is
not complete after the eighteen-month period, up to one hundred percent
of the grant. If an extension is permitted, twenty percent of the grant
shall be repaid for each month that the project is not complete after the
extension period, up to one hundred percent of the grant.
-2-

LB176 LB176
2025 2025
(3)(a) As part of the application, the applicant shall agree to
submit the broadband network completed as a result of the grant to speed
tests as determined by the commission. The grant recipient shall conduct
the speed tests and submit the results to the commission. The speed tests
shall be conducted for one week using a random sample of locations of
consumers who subscribe to the network completed as a result of the
grant.
(b) If the broadband network does not provide service at the speeds
required pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section according to the
speed tests under subdivision (3)(a) of this section, the grant recipient
shall be allowed a reasonable time to address the speed deficiencies and
conduct a second set of speed tests as described in subdivision (3)(a) of
this section. If the broadband network does not provide service at the
speeds required pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section according
to the second set of speed tests, the grant recipient shall repay the
grant.
(4) As part of the application, the applicant shall provide a
resolution of project support adopted by each county, city, and village
in which the proposed project will be located. The resolution of project
support shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) A map of the proposed project area;
(b) Acknowledgement that the applicant will be applying for
appropriate permits; and
(c) A proposed timeline for the proposed project.
(5) (4) No applicant shall be eligible to receive a grant if such
applicant uses or provides any communications equipment or service deemed
to pose a threat to national security identified on the Covered List
developed pursuant to 47 C.F.R. 1.50002, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2023, and published by the Public Safety and Homeland Security
Bureau of the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to the federal
Secure and Trusted Communications Networks Act of 2019, 47 U.S.C. 1601 et
-3-

LB176 LB176
2025 2025
seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2023, and the rules adopted
pursuant to such act by the Federal Communications Commission on November
11, 2022, in its Report and Order FCC 22-84.
Sec. 2. Original section 86-1304, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-